Utah statutes.
57-2a-7.   Form of acknowledgment.

(1)  The form of acknowledgment set forth in this section, if properly completed, is sufficient under any law of this state.  It is known as "Statutory Short Form of Acknowledgment."  This section does not preclude the use of other forms.

State of __________	)

) ss.

County of _________	)

The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (person acknowledging, title or representative capacity, if any).

___________________________________________

(Signature of Person Taking Acknowledgment)

(Seal)				       (Title)

My commission expires:				         Residing at:

______________________	______________________________

(2)  The phrases "My commission expires" and "Residing at" may be omitted if this information is included in the notarial seal.



Amended by Chapter 306, 2007 General Session

